Utah statutes.
58-41-12.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  Each license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  At the time of renewal the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of completion of scheduled graduate level professional training, related clinically to the profession of speech-language pathology or audiology, as may be established by the division by rule, in cooperation with the board.

(3)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

